Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.39
Copyrighted material; used for rebroadcasting; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, license, or rental of or the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of personal property containing copyrighted material if the purchaser, lessee, licensee, or renter is operating under a certificate from the Federal Communications Commission and possesses such personal property for rebroadcasting to the general public, regardless of whether the property is in the form of satellite transmissions, films, records, tapes, discs, or other media.

Laws 1994, LB 901, § 3.